Missouri, session 2026, HB1959.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto three new sections, to be
known as sections 9.390, 9.391, and 9.392, to read as follows:
9.390. The month of June is hereby designated as "Immigrant Heritage Month"
in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
events and activities to celebrate the accomplishments and contributions of immigrants
and their children to make Missouri a healthier, safer, more diverse, and more
prosperous place.
9.391. October second each year is hereby designated as "Wrongful Conviction
Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
events and activities to raise awareness about individuals who have been convicted of
crimes they did not commit and to focus on the causes of and remedies for wrongful
convictions, an issue that affects and devastates individuals, families, and societies
worldwide.
9.392. December first each year is hereby designated as "Freeman Bosley, Sr.
Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
events and activities to celebrate the legendary St. Louis City politician who retired in
2017 after thirty years of service to the city and was an advocate for young people
participating in government and engaging in public service.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.